Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Chapter 18 Cigarette Taxes

Law reviews. —

For article, “Practitioner's Guide to Valuation and Assessment Appeals of State and Local Assessed Property,” see XXXII Land & Water L. Rev. 173 (1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

71 am. Jur. 2d State and Local Taxation § 548.

47B C.J.S. Internal Revenue § 597; 85 C.J.S. Taxation §§ 2028, 2029.

§ 39-18-101.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Cash” means United States currency, certified bank checks or bank cashier’s checks payable in United States currency;

“Sale” or “sell” means any exchange or transfer of title or possession within the state including installment credit and conditional sales to any other person for a consideration;

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 186, § 2.

“Wholesale purchase price” means the established price for which a manufacturer sells the nicotine product to a wholesaler exclusive of any discount or other reduction;

“Wholesaler” means any person who:

Whether located within or without Wyoming, imports, sells or distributes nicotine products into this state for sale or resale;

Purchases nicotine products in this state for sale or resale;

Purchases cigarettes for sale or resale through mechanical vending devices except persons who sell cigarettes in vending devices which are owned or leased by them and located in their place of business;

Sells or distributes for sale or resale cigarettes over the internet or through any other means of direct or indirect mail solicitation or delivery to any person in this state.

“Cigarette importer” means any person who imports into the United States, either directly or indirectly, a finished cigarette for sale or distribution in this state;

“Cigarette manufacturer” means any person who manufactures, fabricates, assembles, processes or labels a finished cigarette for sale in this state. “Cigarette manufacturer” includes any person who maintains at a retail or wholesale establishment a machine which enables a person to process into a roll or tube, tobacco or any product made or derived from tobacco;

“Moist snuff” means any moist finely cut ground or powdered tobacco intended to be placed in the oral cavity, other than dry snuff;

“Electronic cigarette” means any device that can be used to deliver aerosolized or vaporized nicotine or synthetic nicotine to the person using the device and includes any component, part and accessory of the device and any vapor material intended to be aerosolized or vaporized during the use of the device. “Electronic cigarette” includes, without limitation, any electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe, electronic hooka, vapor pen and any similar product or device. “Electronic cigarette” does not include a battery or battery charger if sold separately from the electronic cigarette and does not include any product regulated as a drug or device by the United States food and drug administration under subchapter V of the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act;

“Vapor material” means any liquid solution or other material containing nicotine or synthetic nicotine that is depleted as an electronic cigarette is used. “Vapor material” includes liquid solution or other material containing nicotine or synthetic nicotine that is sold with or inside an electronic cigarette;

“Nicotine product” means tobacco products as defined by W.S. 14-3-301(a)(i), electronic cigarettes and vapor material.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 155, § 1; 2005, ch. 77, § 1; 2009, ch. 43, § 1; 2012, ch. 65, § 2; 2019 ch. 186, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Cross references. —

As to the prohibition on importing tobacco products in violation of federal law,, see §

35-7-1501

.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a)(v)(A), added “Whether located within or without Wyoming” and inserted “sells or distributes”; added (a)(v)(D); added (a)(vi) and (a)(vii); and made stylistic changes.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added (a)(viii).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a)(vii), added the second sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed (a)(iii), which read: "`This article' means W.S.

39-18-101

through

39-18-111

."

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(iv) substituted “nicotine product” for “tobacco product”; in (a)(v)(A) and (a)(v)(B) substituted “nicotine products” for “cigarettes, cigars, snuff or other tobacco products”; and added (a)(ix) through (a)(xi).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

§ 39-18-102.
Administration; confidentiality.

The payment of the taxes required by this article shall be evidenced by the affixing of stamps, imprints or impressions on each package of cigarettes sold or distributed by a licensed wholesaler. The department shall obtain suitable stamps and sell them to licensed wholesalers for cash at a six percent (6%) discount. The department may deposit cigarette tax stamps in banks within Wyoming for disbursement to licensed wholesalers pursuant to rules and regulations of the department. The department shall keep accurate records of all stamps sold. The department may authorize licensed wholesalers to use department approved metering machines to affix imprints or impressions in lieu of affixing stamps. The machine shall be sealed by the department and used pursuant to rules and regulations of the department. The department shall inspect and read each metering machine at least once a month or may approve and appoint a bank within Wyoming of the wholesaler’s choice to act as setting agent pursuant to rules and regulations of the department. Meter settings shall be sold to licensed wholesalers for cash at a six percent (6%) discount. Wholesalers purchasing stamps, imprints or impressions with other than cash shall furnish the department a bond of not less than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) or such other amount as specified by the department.

The taxes imposed by W.S. 39-18-103(a)(iii) and (v) shall be paid by the wholesaler. The wholesaler shall be entitled to retain four percent (4%) of any tax collected under W.S. 39-18-103(a)(iii) and (v).

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 155, § 1; 2020 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b) substituted “taxes imposed” for “tax imposed” and “W.S. 39-18-103(a)(iii) and (v)” for “W.S. 39-18-103(a)(iii)” twice.

§ 39-18-103.
Imposition.

Taxable event. The following event shall constitute a taxable event under this article:

There is levied and shall be collected and paid to the department an excise tax at the rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(a) upon the sale of each cigarette sold by wholesalers;

There is levied and shall be paid to the department an excise tax at the rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(b) upon the use or storage by consumers of cigarettes in Wyoming but only if the tax imposed by paragraph (i) of this subsection has not been paid;

In addition to the other taxes imposed by this subsection, there is levied and assessed upon cigars, snuff and other tobacco products purchased or imported into this state by wholesalers for resale, except cigarettes taxed under this subsection, an excise tax at the rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(c) or (e), as applicable;

The tax imposed by paragraph (iii) of this subsection shall also be imposed upon the use or storage by consumers of cigars, snuff and other tobacco products in this state, and upon those consumers, at the rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(d) or (f), as applicable. This tax shall not apply if the tax imposed by paragraph (iii) of this subsection has been paid;

In addition to the other taxes imposed by this subsection, there is levied and assessed upon electronic cigarettes and vapor material purchased or imported into this state by wholesalers for resale an excise tax at the rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(g);

The tax imposed by paragraph (v) of this subsection shall also be imposed upon the use or storage by consumers of electronic cigarettes and vapor material in this state, and upon those consumers, at the rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(g). This tax shall not apply if the tax imposed by paragraph (v) of this subsection has been paid.

Basis of tax. The state preempts the field of imposing taxes on nicotine products and no city, town or county shall impose, levy or collect taxes upon the sale, occupation or privilege of selling nicotine products. This subsection shall not be construed to prevent a city, town or county from regulating the public use of nicotine products.

Taxpayer. The following taxpayers are liable for the tax imposed by this article:

There is levied and shall be collected and paid to the department an excise tax at the rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(a) upon the sale of each cigarette sold by wholesalers;

There is levied and shall be paid to the department an excise tax at the rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(b) upon the use or storage by consumers of cigarettes in Wyoming but only if the tax imposed by paragraph (i) of this subsection has not been paid;

In addition to the other taxes imposed by this subsection, there is levied and assessed upon cigars, snuff and other tobacco products purchased or imported into this state by wholesalers for resale, except cigarettes taxed under this subsection, an excise tax at the rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(c) or (e), as applicable;

The tax imposed by paragraph (iii) of this subsection shall also be imposed upon the use or storage by consumers of cigars, snuff and other tobacco products in this state, and upon those consumers, at the rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(d) or (f), as applicable. This tax shall not apply if the tax imposed by paragraph (iii) of this subsection has been paid;

In addition to the other taxes imposed by this subsection, there is levied and assessed upon electronic cigarettes and vapor material purchased or imported into this state by wholesalers for resale an excise tax at the rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(g);

The tax imposed by paragraph (v) of this subsection shall also be imposed upon the use or storage by consumers of electronic cigarettes and vapor material in this state, and upon those consumers, at the rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(g). This tax shall not apply if the tax imposed by paragraph (v) of this subsection has been paid.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 155, § 1; 2001, ch. 16, § 1; 2003, ch. 52, § 1; 2009, ch. 43, § 1; 2020 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “or (e), as applicable” for “of the wholesale purchase price at which the tobacco products are purchased by wholesalers from manufacturers” in (a)(iii) and (c)(iii); and substituted “or (f), as applicable” for “of the retail price of the cigar, snuff or other tobacco product” in (a)(iv) and (c)(iv).

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (a)(v) and (a)(vi); in (b) substituted “nicotine products” for “cigarettes” and added the last sentence; and added (c)(v) and (c)(vi).

Enrolled-member Indian required to collect taxes from non-Indiansand from nonenrolled-member Indians. —

This section required an enrolled member of an Indian tribe who owned and operated a trading company located on the reservation to collect the tax on cigarettes sold to non-Indians and to Indians who were not enrolled members of the tribe. Stagner v. Wyoming State Tax Comm'n, 682 P.2d 326,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1984).

§ 39-18-104.
Taxation rate.

There is levied and shall be collected and paid to the department an excise tax at the rate of three cents ($.03) upon the sale of each cigarette sold by wholesalers.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 21, § 2.

There is levied and shall be paid to the department an excise tax at the rate of three cents ($.03) upon the use or storage by consumers of cigarettes in Wyoming but only if the tax imposed by subsection (a) of this section has not been paid.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 21, § 2.

In addition to the other taxes imposed by this section, there is levied and assessed upon cigars, snuff and other tobacco products purchased or imported into this state by wholesalers for resale, except cigarettes and moist snuff taxed under this section, an excise tax at the rate of twenty percent (20%) of the wholesale purchase price at which the tobacco products are purchased by wholesalers from manufacturers.

The tax imposed by subsection (c) of this section shall also be imposed upon the use or storage by consumers of cigars, snuff and other tobacco products other than cigarettes and moist snuff in this state, and upon those consumers, at the rate of ten percent (10%) of the retail price of the cigar, snuff or other tobacco product other than cigarettes and moist snuff. This tax shall not apply if the tax imposed by subsection (c) of this section has been paid.

In addition to the other taxes imposed by this section, there is levied and assessed upon moist snuff purchased or imported into this state by wholesalers for resale, an excise tax at the rate of sixty cents ($0.60) for any amount of moist snuff up to one (1) ounce plus a proportionate tax at the like rate on any fractional parts of more than one (1) ounce. The tax on moist snuff shall be imposed based on the net weight as listed by the manufacturer.

The tax imposed by subsection (e) of this section shall also be imposed upon the use or storage by consumers of moist snuff in this state, and upon those consumers, at the rate of sixty cents ($0.60) for any amount of moist snuff up to one (1) ounce plus a proportionate tax at the like rate on any fractional parts of more than one (1) ounce. This tax shall not apply if the tax imposed by subsection (e) of this section has been paid. The tax on moist snuff shall be imposed based on the net weight as listed by the manufacturer.

In addition to the other taxes imposed by this section, there is levied and assessed upon electronic cigarettes and vapor material purchased or imported into this state by wholesalers for resale, an excise tax at the rate of fifteen percent (15%) of the wholesale purchase price at which the electronic cigarettes and vapor material are purchased by wholesalers from manufacturers.

The tax imposed by subsection (g) of this section shall also be imposed upon the use or storage by consumers of electronic cigarettes and vapor material in this state, and upon those consumers, at the rate of seven and one-half percent (7.5%) of the retail price of the electronic cigarettes and vapor material. This tax shall not apply if the tax imposed by subsection (g) of this section has been paid.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 155, § 1; 2001, ch. 16, § 1; 2003, ch. 52, § 1; 2009, ch. 43, § 1; 2019 ch. 21, §§
1, 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, added “and moist snuff” in (c); added “other than cigarettes and moist snuff” twice in (d); and added (e) and (f).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019,
in (a) and (b), added "at the rate of three cents ($.03)" after "tax", added a period after "wholesalers" and deleted "as follows:".

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (a)(i), which read: "Six-tenths of a cent ($.006); and"; repealed former (a)(ii), which read: "Two and four-tenths cents ($.024)"; repealed former (b)(i), which read: "Six-tenths of a cent ($.006); and"; and repealed former (b)(ii), which read: "Two and four-tenths cents ($.024)".

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, added (g) and (h).

§ 39-18-105.
Exemptions.

Sales of cigarettes to any agency of the United States government, sales in interstate commerce or the taxation of any transaction prohibited by the United States constitution are exempted from the provisions of this article but shall be reported to the department in the manner prescribed by it.

The sales and use tax exemptions specified in W.S.

39-15-105

and

39-16-105

are not applicable to this article.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-18-106.
Licensing; permits.

Every wholesaler, cigarette importer and cigarette manufacturer who sells or offers to sell nicotine products in this state must have a license to do so issued by the department. No license or renewal of a license shall be granted under this section unless the wholesaler states in writing, under penalty for false swearing, that he shall comply fully with W.S.

9-4-1201

through

9-4-1209

. The license fee is ten dollars ($10.00) per year or fraction thereof and is valid through June 30 in each year. The license will be granted only to wholesalers who own or operate the place from which sales are made and additional licenses must be obtained for each separate location. The licenses are transferable pursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the department.

Repealed by Laws 2005, ch. 77, § 2.

No license for a cigarette wholesaler, cigarette importer or cigarette manufacturer shall be granted, maintained or renewed if the applicant:

Is not a participating manufacturer as defined in subsection II(jj) of the master settlement agreement as defined in W.S.

9-4-1201

(a)(v), or is not in full compliance with W.S.

9-4-1201

through

9-4-1210

;

Has imported or caused to be imported into the United States any tobacco products in violation of 19 U.S.C. 1681a; or

Has imported or caused to be imported into the United States, or manufactured for sale or distribution in the United States any cigarette that does not fully comply with the federal Cigarette Labeling and Advertising Act, (15 U.S.C. 1331, et seq.).

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 155, § 1; 2003, ch. 150, § 2; 2005, ch. 77, §§ 1, 2; 2019 ch. 21, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “cigarette importer and cigarette manufacturer” in the first sentence in (a); repealed former (b), which provided requirements for out-of-state sellers and shippers to obtain a license or permit; and added (c).

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019,
in (a), added "License fees paid under this subsection shall be deposited in the state general fund." at the end of the paragraph.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a) substituted “sell nicotine products” for “sell cigarettes, cigars, snuff or other tobacco products.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction and application of state statutes forbidding possession, transportation or sale of unstamped or see licensed cigarettes or other tobacco products, 46 ALR3d 1342.

§ 39-18-107.
Compliance; collection procedures.

Returns and reports. The following shall apply:

Each wholesaler shall keep complete and accurate records of all nicotine products purchased and sold for three (3) years. The records shall be in the form prescribed by the department and will be available for inspection by the department at any reasonable time. The department may investigate and examine the stock of cigarettes upon any premises where they are stored or sold;

On or before the tenth day of each calendar quarter, every consumer who, during the preceding calendar quarter, has acquired title to or possession of nicotine products for use or storage in this state, upon which products the tax imposed by W.S. 39-18-103(a)(iii) and (v) has not been paid, shall file a return with the department showing the quantity of such products so acquired. The return shall be made upon a form furnished and prescribed by the department and shall contain such other information as the department may require. The return shall be accompanied by a remittance for the full unpaid tax liability shown by it.

Payment. The following shall apply:

There is levied and shall be collected and paid to the department an excise tax at the rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(a) upon the sale of each cigarette sold by wholesalers;

There is levied and shall be paid to the department an excise tax at the rate imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(b) upon the use or storage by consumers of cigarettes in Wyoming but only if the tax imposed by paragraph (i) of this subsection has not been paid;

No wholesaler shall sell or transfer any stamps issued under the provisions of this article.

Timelines. The following shall apply:

No later than the twentieth day of the month following the sale of cigarettes, or the month following the end of the calendar quarter for nicotine products other than cigarettes, each wholesaler shall return to the department the following information on forms furnished by the department:

The number of packages of cigarettes sold in each incorporated city and town;

The number of packages of cigarettes sold in each county outside the incorporated cities and towns;

Other information required by the department;

The amount paid by the wholesaler to the manufacturer for nicotine products other than moist snuff. For sales of moist snuff, the return shall include the net weight as listed by the manufacturer. The department shall compile the information provided under this subparagraph with respect to moist snuff tobacco sales on an annual basis and shall report the information to the legislature every five (5) years beginning on July 1, 2014.

The stamps, imprints or impressions shall be affixed by the wholesaler any time before the cigarettes are transferred from his possession.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 155, § 1; 2001, ch. 16, § 1; 2003, ch. 52, § 1; 2009, ch. 43, § 1; 2020 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (c)(i)(D), added “other than moist stuff” at the end of the first sentence, and added the second and third sentences.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(i) substituted “nicotine products” for “cigarettes, cigars, snuff or other tobacco products”; in (a)(ii), the introductory language of (c)(i), and (c)(i)(D) substituted “nicotine products” for “cigars, snuff or other tobacco products”; in (a)(ii) substituted “W.S. 39-18-103(a)(iii) and (v)” for “W.S. 39-18-103(a)(iii)”; and in the introductory language of (c)(i) added “other than cigarettes” following “products.”

Section constitutional as applied to Indian operating tradingcompany on reservation. —

Former § 39-6-106, as applied to the seizure of cigarettes without stamps purchased by and enroute to a member of an Indian tribe who owned and operated a trading company located on the reservation, was constitutional. Stagner v. Wyoming State Tax Comm'n, 682 P.2d 326,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 289

(Wyo. 1984).

§ 39-18-108.
Enforcement.

Audits. There are no specific applicable provisions for audits for this chapter.

Interest. There are no specific applicable provisions for interest for this chapter.

Penalties. The following shall apply:

Any package of cigarettes found in this state without stamps, imprints or impressions affixed thereto as provided by this article is contraband goods and may be seized without a warrant by the department, with board approval, or any peace officer of this state when so directed by the department. This section does not apply to cigarettes in the original unopened shipping package in the possession of or in transit to a licensed wholesaler or to owners of cigarettes not willfully or intentionally evading the tax imposed by this article;

The following acts are misdemeanors punishable by a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100.00) or imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six (6) months or both:

Selling or distributing nicotine products as a wholesaler without a license;

Selling, offering to sell, displaying for sale or possessing with intent to sell cigarettes without proper stamps, imprints or impressions;

Evading or aiding or abetting any person to evade the payment of the taxes imposed by this article;

Making any false or fraudulent return.

Each act in violation of paragraphs (ii) and (vii) through (xi) of this subsection is a separate offense;

The penalties specified in paragraphs (ii), (iii) and (vii) through (xi) of this subsection are in addition to the provisions of paragraph (i) of this subsection and subsection (e) of this section;

The department may revoke the license of any wholesaler violating any provision of this article after a hearing. No license shall be issued to a wholesaler for two (2) years following revocation of his license;

Any person who purchases any nicotine product for resale in this state from other than a licensed wholesaler is liable for the tax and any penalties and interest imposed under this paragraph as if he were a wholesaler under this act and shall pay an additional penalty of twenty-five percent (25%) of any tax due. Any wholesaler or other person who fails to file any return or to pay any tax within the time required or permitted by this subsection shall be subject to a penalty of five percent (5%) of the amount of the tax due, plus one percent (1%) of the tax for each month of delinquency or fraction thereof. The department may waive all or any part of this penalty for good cause shown;

Any person who does any act prohibited by this article, or omits, neglects or refuses to comply with any duty imposed upon him by this article, or causes not to be done any of the things required by this article, or does any act prohibited by this article, may, in addition to any other penalty provided by this article, be liable for a penalty of not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or five (5) times the retail value of the nicotine product at issue, whichever is lesser, to be recovered in a civil action;

Any person who fails to pay any tax imposed by this article at the time prescribed by law or department rule or regulation may, in addition to any other penalty provided by this article, be liable for a penalty of not to exceed five (5) times the tax due, but unpaid, to be recovered in a civil action;

Any fixture, equipment or other personal property used by a nicotine product wholesaler or retailer to commit any of the following acts shall be subject to forfeiture to the state, if the retail value of the cigarettes involved or any tax involved in the act exceeds five hundred dollars ($500.00):

Failing to keep or make any record, return, report or inventory required by this article, if the failure was with the intent to defraud the state;

Keeping or making any false or fraudulent record, return, report or inventory required under this article;

Refusing to pay any tax imposed by this article;

Attempting in any manner to evade or defeat the requirements of this article.

Any person who, with intent to defraud, fails to comply with any requirement of this article or regulation prescribed hereunder may, in addition to any other penalty provided in this article, for each such offense, be fined not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), or be imprisoned for not to exceed one (1) year, or both;

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the sale or possession for sale of counterfeit cigarettes with the intent to defraud by a cigarette manufacturer, importer, wholesaler or retailer may result in the seizure of the product and related machinery by the department or any law enforcement agency and shall be punishable as provided in this paragraph. As used in this paragraph, “counterfeit cigarettes” means cigarettes which have a false manufacturing label or any package of cigarettes which bears a counterfeit tax stamp. Any counterfeit cigarettes seized by the department under paragraph (i) of this subsection shall be destroyed. The following penalties shall apply:

A first violation involving a total quantity of less than two (2) cartons of cigarettes may be punishable by a fine of not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) or five (5) times the retail value of the cigarettes involved, whichever is less;

A subsequent violation involving a total quantity of less than two (2) cartons of cigarettes may be punishable by a fine of not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) or five (5) times the retail value of the cigarettes involved, whichever is greater;

A first violation involving a total quantity of two (2) cartons of cigarettes or more may be punishable by a fine of not to exceed two thousand dollars ($2,000.00) or five (5) times the retail value of the cigarettes involved, whichever is less;

A subsequent violation involving a quantity of two (2) cartons of cigarettes or more shall be punishable by a fine of not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00).

Any penalty collected under the provisions of this subsection shall be deposited in the public school fund of the appropriate county as required by article 7, section 5 of the Wyoming constitution.

Liens. There are no specific applicable provisions for liens for this chapter.

Tax sales. Cigarettes seized in accordance with paragraph (c)(i) of this section shall be sold by the department to a licensed wholesaler to the best advantage of the state. Proceeds from the sale shall be remitted to the state treasurer for deposit into the general fund. The licensed wholesaler purchasing the cigarettes shall pay taxes and affix stamps, imprints or impressions as provided by this article on cigarettes so purchased.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 155, § 1; 2005, ch. 77, § 1; 2020 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added (c)(vii) through (c)(xii), and updated internal references accordingly.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (c)(ii)(A) substituted “nicotine products” for “cigarettes, cigars, snuff or other tobacco products”; in (c)(vi), (c)(vii), and (c)(ix) substituted “nicotine product” for “tobacco product.”

§ 39-18-109.
Taxpayer remedies.

Interpretation requests. There are no specific applicable provisions for interpretation requests for this chapter.

Appeals. There are no specific applicable provisions for appeals for this chapter.

Refunds. The department shall redeem any unused and uncancelled stamps presented by a wholesaler.

Credits. Credit shall be given by the department for taxes paid on unsalable merchandise when the department is satisfied the merchandise has been returned to the manufacturer and when evidenced by a statement signed by the wholesaler and a manufacturer’s representative certifying the number of packages returned.

Redemption. There are no specific applicable provisions for redemption for this chapter.

Escrow. There are no specific applicable provisions for escrow for this chapter.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

Request for review of cigarette seizure to be timely. —

A seizure of cigarettes is an agency action which is subject to judicial review. However, the request for the review must be timely, i.e., it must be within 30 days of the action or of notice of the action, or of the time the person becomes aggrieved or adversely affected by the action, whichever is latest. Stagner v. Wyoming State Tax Comm'n, 642 P.2d 1296,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 322

(Wyo. 1982).

§ 39-18-110.
Statute of limitations.

There are no specific applicable provisions for a statute of limitations for this chapter.

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1.

§ 39-18-111.
Distribution.

Fifteen percent (15%) of the taxes collected pursuant to W.S. 39-18-104(a) and (b) shall be distributed to incorporated cities and towns and to boards of county commissioners in the proportion the cigarette taxes derived from sales within each incorporated city or town or county bears to total cigarette taxes collected. The computation for the distribution shall be made by the department according to the monthly returns filed by the wholesalers. The remainder shall be deposited in the state general fund.

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 21, § 2.

The revenue received from the taxes imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(c), (d), (g) and (h) shall be deposited in the general fund.

Repealed by Laws 2019, ch. 21, § 2..

History.

Laws 1998, ch. 5, § 1; 1999, ch. 155, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 1; 2003, ch. 52, § 1; 2005, ch. 22, § 1; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2019 ch. 21, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2020 ch. 53, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “Until July 1, 2006” at the beginning of (c).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, substituted “distributed by the department” for “transferred to the state treasurer who shall distribute it” and made a related change in the introductory language of (a).

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 21, §
1, effective July 1, 2019,
in (a), substituted "Fifteen percent (15%)" for "Thirty-three and one-third percent (33 1/3%) " and "39-18-104(a) and (b)" for "39-18-104(a)(i) and (b)(i)", added second sentence "The computation for the distribution shall be made by the department according to the monthly returns filed by the wholesalers." and substituted "deposited in the state general fund." for "distributed by the department, as follows:"

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 21, §
2, effective July 1, 2019, repealed former (a)(i) through (a)(iii), which read: "(i) All license fees under W.S. 39-18-106(a) shall be credited to the state general fund; (ii) Thirty-eight and one-fourth percent (38 1/4%) of the taxes collected shall be credited to the state general fund; (iii) Sixty-one and three-fourths percent (61 3/4%) of the taxes collected shall be distributed to incorporated cities and towns and to boards of county commissioners in the proportion the cigarette taxes derived from sales within each incorporated city or town or county bears to total cigarette license taxes collected. The computation for the distribution shall be made by the department according to the monthly returns filed by the wholesalers."; and repealed former (c), which read: "The revenue received from the tax imposed by W.S. 39-18-104(a)(ii) and (b)(ii) shall be deposited in the general fund."

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (b) substituted “taxes imposed” for “tax imposed” and “W.S. 39-18-104(c), (d), (g) and (h)” for “W.S. 39-18-104(c) and (d).”